Utah statutes.
73-18a-15.   Arrest for violation -- Procedure.
Whenever any person is arrested for any violation of the provisions of this
chapter or rule promulgated under this chapter, the procedure for arrest is
the same as specified in Sections 77-7-22 through 77-7-24.
